Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.840 is amended to read:
181A.840. As used in ORS 181A.360, 181A.840 to 181A.918, 181A.895 and 181A.995:
(1) “Certification” means recognition by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training
that a private security professional meets all of the qualifications listed in ORS 181A.855.
(2) “Executive manager” means a person:
(a) Who is authorized to act on behalf of a company or business in matters of licensure  and
certification;
(b) Who is authorized to hire and terminate personnel;
(c) Whose primary  responsibility is the management of certified private security professionals;
and
(d) Who has final responsibility for a company’s or business’s compliance with  ORS 181A.840 to
181A.918.
(3) “Instructor” means  any person who has been certified by the department as meeting the re-
quirements to provide instruction to private security providers or applicants.
(4) “License” means recognition by the department  that an executive manager or supervisory
manager meets the requirements adopted by the  Board on Public Safety Standards and Training as
necessary to provide private security services.
(5) “Primary responsibility” means an activity that is fundamental to, and  required or expected
in, the regular course of employment and is not merely incidental to employment.
(6)(a) “Private security  entity” [ means a person engaged in the business of providing private se-
curity that: ]
[(A) Employs private security providers; or ]
[(B) Contracts or subcontracts with an  existing licensed private security entity to provide private
security services. ] includes any person that:
(A) For an agreed remuneration or rate of pay, recruits, solicits, supplies or  employs
private security providers to perform private security services for another person;
(B) For an agreed remuneration or rate of pay, recruits, solicits, supplies or employs
private security providers on behalf of another employer to  provide private security services;
or
(C) Enters into a subcontract  with another person to perform any of the activities de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
Enrolled Senate Bill 300 (SB 300-A) Page 1
(b) “Private security entity” does  not include a special campus security provider commissioned
under ORS 352.118 or a private security provider on a campus of an institution  of higher education
regulated under ORS 181A.972.
(7) “Private security  professional” means an individual who performs, as the individual’s primary
responsibility, private security  services for consideration, regardless of whether the individual, while
performing the private security services, is armed or  unarmed or wears a uniform or plain clothes,
and regardless of whether the individual is employed part-time or full-time  to perform private secu-
rity services.
(8) “Private security provider” means any individual who performs the functions of a private
security professional, executive manager, supervisory manager or instructor.
(9) “Private security services”  means the performance of at least one of the following activities:
(a) Observing and reporting unlawful activity.
(b) Preventing or detecting theft or misappropriation of goods, money or other items of value.
(c) Protecting individuals  or property, including but not limited to proprietary information, from
harm or misappropriation.
(d) Controlling access to premises being  protected or, with respect to a licensee of the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission, controlling access  to premises at an entry to the premises or any
portion of the premises where minors are prohibited.
(e) Securely moving prisoners.
(f) Taking enforcement action by detaining persons or placing persons  under arrest under ORS
133.225.
(g) Providing canine services for guarding premises or for detecting unlawful devices  or sub-
stances.
(10) “Supervisory manager”  means an employee of or a person supervised by an executive
manager who has as a primary responsibility the  supervision of certified private security profes-
sionals.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 300 (SB 300-A) Page 2